South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S134.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 29, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-29-250. (A) The State Board of Education may develop and adopt academic standards that incorporate the Bible into its curriculum for world history, the history of western civilization, United States history, South Carolina history, and literature. The standards should emphasize the influence that the Bible has on our common history and literature. (B) Academic standards adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to this section shall: (1) ensure that the curriculum is objective and nondevotional and that it does not attempt to indoctrinate students as to either the truth or falsity of the biblical materials or texts incorporated; (2) not include teaching of religious doctrine or sectarian interpretation of the Bible; and (3) not disparage or encourage a commitment to a set of religious beliefs. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----